Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5831.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 6-40.1 of the General Laws entitled "Senior Savings Protection Act
[Effective January 1, 2025.]" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
6-40.1-2.1. Senior discounts.
Any person or business engaged in the sale of goods or services, who offers a discount to
its customers for utilizing automatic payment systems, via an automated clearinghouse (ACH) or
an electronic funds transfer (EFT) or similar payment systems, shall provide the same discount to
any person who is sixty-five (65) years of age or older who makes a payment using paper checks.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001945
========